Maryland, session 2026, HB0506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–203.
(a) Before issuing bonds, the governing body of the political subdivision shall:
(1) by resolution:
(i) designate a contiguous area within its jurisdiction as a
development district;
(ii) identify an area that has been designated a sustainable
community; or
(iii) identify an area that has been designated a RISE zone;
(2) receive from the Supervisor of Assessments a certification of the
amount of the original base, or if applicable, the adjusted assessable base; and
(3) pledge that until the bonds are fully paid, or a longer period, the real
property taxes in the development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community shall
be divided as follows:
(i) the portion of the taxes that would be produced at the current tax
rate on the original taxable value base shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities in
the same manner as taxes on other property are paid; and
(ii) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
the portion of the taxes on the tax increment that normally would be paid into the general
fund of the political subdivision shall be paid into the special fund established under §
12–208 of this subtitle and applied in accordance with § 12–209 of this subtitle.
(D) BEFORE ISSUING BONDS FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT APPROVED UNDER SUBTITLE 2A OF THIS TITLE, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL, BY RESOLUTION, PLEDGE THAT UNTIL THE
BONDS ARE FULLY PAID, OR A LONGER PERIOD, THE REAL PROPERTY TAXES IN THE
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT SHALL BE DIVIDED AS FOLLOWS:

HOUSE BILL 506 3
(1) THE PORTION OF THE TAXES THAT WOULD BE PRODUCED AT THE
CURRENT TAX RATE ON THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE BASE SHALL BE PAID TO THE
RESPECTIVE TAXING AUTHORITIES IN THE SAME MANNER AS TAXES ON OTHER
PROPERTY ARE PAID; AND
(2) THE PORTION OF THE TAXES ON THE TAX INCREMENT THAT
NORMALLY WOULD BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION SHALL BE PAID TO THE TRUSTEE OF THE PROJECT TRUST ACCOUNT
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 2A OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 2A. TRANSFORMATIONAL PROJECT FINANCING PROGRAM.
12–2A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CORPORATION” MEANS THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION.
(C) “DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–201 OF
THIS TITLE OR ARTICLE II, § 62 OF THE CHARTER OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(D) “DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENT” MEANS THE ADJUSTMENT TO STATE
REVENUES UNDER § 12–2A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “FUND” MEANS THE TRANSFORMATIONAL PROJECT FINANCING FUND.
(F) “PRIORITY AREA” INCLUDES:
(1) A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 6 OF THE
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
(2) A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, AS DEFINED UNDER §
7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(3) AN ENTERPRISE ZONE DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 7
OF THIS ARTICLE;
(4) AN ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT DESIGNATED UNDER
TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 7 OF THIS ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 506
(5) A MAIN STREET MARYLAND COMMUNITY DESIGNATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT; AND
(6) A PRIORITY FUNDING AREA DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 7B OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(G) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE TRANSFORMATIONAL PROJECT FINANCING
PROGRAM.
(H) (1) “STATE REVENUE” MEANS THE REVENUE FROM:
(I) THE INCOME TAX IMPOSED BY THE STATE UNDER TITLE 10
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(II) THE SALES AND USE TAX IMPOSED BY THE STATE UNDER
TITLE 11 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT INCLUDING THE SALES AND USE
ATTRIBUTABLE DURING THE CONSTRUCTION PERIOD OF A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT; AND
(III) OTHER STATE TAXES DESIGNATED BY THE COMPTROLLER
AS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
(2) “STATE REVENUE” DOES NOT INCLUDE STATE PROPERTY TAX
REVENUES.
(I) “STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT” MEANS A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT THAT HAS A TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN AND HAS BEEN
APPROVED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) “TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN” MEANS AN IMPROVEMENT PLAN FOR A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT THAT:
(1) IS OF A SCALE OR MIX OF USES THAT MAKES IT REASONABLY
LIKELY TO INCREASE THE POPULATION, EMPLOYMENT, OR COMMERCIAL ACTIVITY
IN THE AREA OF AND SURROUNDING THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(2) REPRESENTS ANTICIPATED NEW ECONOMIC ACTIVITY WITH A NET
POSITIVE FISCAL IMPACT TO THE STATE AFTER A DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENT;
(3) IS NOT ECONOMICALLY VIABLE WITHOUT STATE PARTICIPATION;
AND

HOUSE BILL 506 5
(4) INCLUDES IMPROVEMENTS OR SITE WORK THAT WILL BENEFIT
THE COMMUNITY.
12–2A–02.
(A) THERE IS A TRANSFORMATIONAL PROJECT FINANCING PROGRAM IN
THE STATE.
(B) THE CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM AND EXERCISE
ALL POWERS GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO SUPPORT DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICTS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE OR ARTICLE II, § 62 OF
THE CHARTER OF BALTIMORE CITY, FOR WHICH A GOVERNING BODY OF A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION HAS APPROVED A TAX INCREMENT FINANCING PLAN AND
PLEDGED PROPERTY TAX REVENUES, BY PLEDGING NET–NEW STATE REVENUES
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT TO SUPPORT THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF A TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN.
12–2A–03.
(A) A GOVERNING BODY OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY APPLY TO THE
CORPORATION FOR A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT TO BE APPROVED AS A
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IF:
(1) A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT HAS BEEN FORMED AND A TAX
INCREMENT FINANCING PLAN HAS BEEN APPROVED UNDER SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS
TITLE OR ARTICLE II, § 62 OF THE CHARTER OF BALTIMORE CITY BEFORE JULY 1,
2031;
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY HAS PLEDGED LOCAL PROPERTY TAX
REVENUES TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT; AND
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY HAS MADE A PRELIMINARY
DETERMINATION THAT THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT HAS A TRANSFORMATIONAL
PLAN.
(B) (1) THE CORPORATION SHALL ESTABLISH:
(I) GUIDELINES FOR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION TO ASSESS WHETHER AN IMPROVEMENT PLAN MAY BE A
TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN; AND

HOUSE BILL 506
(II) AN APPLICATION SUBMISSION, EVALUATION, AND
APPROVAL PROCESS.
(2) THE CORPORATION MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE APPLICATION
FEE.
(C) (1) THE CORPORATION SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER AN
IMPROVEMENT PLAN FOR A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IS A TRANSFORMATIONAL
PLAN USING OBJECTIVE CRITERIA AND NOTIFY THE APPLICANT OF AN APPROVAL
DECISION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE COMPLETED APPLICATION.
(2) IN MAKING APPROVAL DECISIONS, THE CORPORATION SHALL
RETAIN DOCUMENTATION SUPPORTING THE DECISION.
(3) IF AN APPLICATION IS DENIED, THE APPLICANT MAY APPEAL THE
DECISION WITHIN 60 DAYS.
(D) IN ADMINISTERING APPROVALS, THE CORPORATION SHALL ENSURE
THAT STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS ARE APPROVED IN A MANNER
THAT PROVIDES MEANINGFUL PARTICIPATION BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS OF
VARIED POPULATION SIZE AND GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION ACROSS THE STATE WHILE
ACCOUNTING FOR THE NUMBER AND QUALITY OF THE APPLICATIONS RECEIVED.
(E) THE CORPORATION SHALL PUBLISH, AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A SUMMARY
OF APPROVED STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS BY POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION, LOCATION WITHIN A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, AND POPULATION SIZE.
(F) (1) FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT THAT IS ABOVE AN AMOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THE CORPORATION, A
REPORT SHALL BE PREPARED BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD–PARTY CONSULTANT
THAT IS ACCEPTABLE TO THE CORPORATION.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL:
(I) QUANTIFY PROJECTED STATE REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE
TO THE TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN;
(II) APPLY THE DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENTS REQUIRED
UNDER § 12–2A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) DEMONSTRATE A POSITIVE NET FISCAL BENEFIT TO THE
STATE OVER THE PROPOSED CAPTURE PERIOD.

HOUSE BILL 506 7
(3) THE CORPORATION MAY NOT APPROVE A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT UNLESS THE REPORT DEMONSTRATES A POSITIVE NET
FISCAL BENEFIT TO THE STATE.
(G) A TRANSFER OF THE TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN, ASSIGNMENT OF
RIGHTS, OR CHANGE OF CONTROL OF A DEVELOPER OR OTHER OBLIGATED PARTY
REQUIRES THE PRIOR WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE CORPORATION, EVIDENCE OF
EQUAL OR GREATER FINANCIAL CAPACITY OF THE TRANSFEREE, AND AN
ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT ACCEPTABLE TO THE CORPORATION.
(H) THE CORPORATION MAY APPROVE LENDER STEP–IN RIGHTS AND
RELATED REMEDIES CONSISTENT WITH GUIDELINES ADOPTED BY THE
CORPORATION.
12–2A–04.
(A) (1) A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IS ELIGIBLE FOR
AN ANNUAL DISBURSEMENT OF NET–NEW STATE REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT TO BE DEPOSITED IN THE FUND FOR
THE LIFE OF THE BONDS, NOT TO EXCEED 30 YEARS AFTER THE STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IS COMPLETED.
(2) (I) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
CERTIFY THE AMOUNT OF NET–NEW STATE REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO EACH
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
(II) WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER CERTIFICATION, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER THE CERTIFIED AMOUNT TO THE FUND FOR
DISBURSEMENT TO THE TRUSTEE OF THE PROJECT TRUST ACCOUNT FOR A
STATE–FUNDED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
(III) THE CORPORATION SHALL NOTIFY THE COMPTROLLER OF
EACH APPROVED STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT AND PROVIDE ANY
INFORMATION REASONABLY REQUIRED BY THE COMPTROLLER TO CERTIFY AND
TRANSFER REVENUE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) THE CORPORATION SHALL TRANSFER FUNDS FROM THE
FUND TO THE TRUSTEE–HELD PROJECT TRUST ACCOUNT FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.

HOUSE BILL 506
(B) STATE REVENUES DISBURSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE LIMITED
TO NET–NEW STATE REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT AND MAY NOT CONSTITUTE A PLEDGE OF FULL FAITH AND
CREDIT OF THE STATE.
(C) THE FUNDS IN A TRUSTEE–HELD PROJECT TRUST ACCOUNT FOR A
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT SHALL BE APPLIED IN THE
FOLLOWING ORDER OF PRIORITY:
(1) PAYMENT OF DEBT SERVICE ON BONDS OR NOTES ISSUED FOR THE
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(2) RESERVE REPLENISHMENT; AND
(3) REIMBURSEMENT OF APPROVED COSTS AS PROVIDED IN THE
TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN FOR THE STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
12–2A–05.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THE DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENTS UNDER THIS
SECTION IS TO ACCOUNT FOR THE LIKELIHOOD THAT A PORTION OF STATE
REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO ENTITIES LOCATED IN A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT WOULD HAVE BEEN GENERATED ELSEWHERE IN THE
STATE IN THE ABSENCE OF A TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN.
(B) (1) TO DETERMINE NET–NEW STATE REVENUE FOR A
TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN, MINIMUM DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENTS SHALL BE
APPLIED TO GROSS REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS
SECTION, PROJECTED INCREASES IN STATE REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO A
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE
FOLLOWING MINIMUM DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENT:
(I) FOR RETAIL AND RESTAURANTS, 60%;
(II) FOR OFFICE SPACE, 25%;
(III) FOR INDUSTRIAL, LOGISTICS, MANUFACTURING, AND
OTHER PRODUCTION SPACES, 10%; AND
(IV) FOR TOURISM AND VISITOR–SERVING USES, 15%.

HOUSE BILL 506 9
(C) (1) AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL EVALUATE
THE DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENT PERCENTAGES USED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) BASED ON MARKET CONDITIONS, EMPIRICAL DATA, AND
SECTOR–SPECIFIC ANALYSIS, THE COMPTROLLER MAY USE DIFFERENT
PERCENTAGES THAN THOSE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO
ACCURATELY REFLECT THE PORTION OF STATE REVENUES THAT REPRESENTS
NET–NEW ECONOMIC ACTIVITY.
(D) A DISPLACEMENT ADJUSTMENT MAY NOT BE APPLIED TO STATE
REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO:
(1) AFFORDABLE HOUSING COMPONENTS OF A TRANSFORMATIONAL
PLAN; OR
(2) PORTIONS OF A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
THAT ARE LOCATED IN A PRIORITY AREA.
(E) STATE REVENUE DISTRIBUTED FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT MAY NOT EXCEED THE NET–NEW STATE REVENUE
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE DISTRICT AFTER APPLICATION OF THE DISPLACEMENT
ADJUSTMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
12–2A–06.
(A) IN ADDITION TO THE USES ALLOWED UNDER SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE
OR ARTICLE II, § 62 OF THE CHARTER OF BALTIMORE CITY, TO THE EXTENT THAT
THE CORPORATION DETERMINES THE COSTS ARE NECESSARY FOR THE ECONOMIC
VIABILITY OF THE TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN, BOND PROCEEDS FOR A
STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT MAY BE USED FOR CONSTRUCTION,
REHABILITATION, OR EXPANSION OF PRIVATELY OWNED BUILDINGS AND RELATED
BUILDING IMPROVEMENTS.
(B) REVENUES AND RESERVES FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT MAY NOT BE USED FOR:
(1) ANY OTHER STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT OR
TRANSFORMATIONAL PLAN; OR
(2) CROSS–COLLATERALIZATION AMONG TRANSFORMATIONAL
PLANS.

HOUSE BILL 506
12–2A–07.
(A) THERE IS A TRANSFORMATIONAL PROJECT FINANCING FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO RECEIVE CERTIFIED NET–NEW STATE
REVENUES ATTRIBUTABLE TO A STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
(C) THE CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR DISBURSEMENTS TO A
TRUSTEE–HELD PROJECT TRUST ACCOUNT FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT TO BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–2A–04(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
12–2A–08.
THE CORPORATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE.
The Charter of Baltimore City
Article II – General Powers

HOUSE BILL 506 11
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall have full power and authority to
exercise all of the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to it by the Constitution of
Maryland or by any Public General or Public Local Laws of the State of Maryland; and in
particular, without limitation upon the foregoing, shall have power by ordinance, or such
other method as may be provided for in its Charter, subject to the provisions of said
Constitution and Public General Laws:
(62)
(d) (1) Before issuing any bonds under this section, the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore shall:
[(1)] (I) designate by ordinance an area or areas within the City of
Baltimore as a “development district”;
[(2)] (II) receive from the Supervisor of Assessments a certification as to
the amount of the original assessable base, or if applicable, the adjusted assessable base;
and
[(3)] (III) provide that until bonds have been fully paid or thereafter, the
property taxes on real property within the development district shall be divided as follows:
[(i)] 1. the portion of the taxes which would be produced by the
rate at which taxes levied each year by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore upon the
original taxable value shall be allocated to and when collected paid into the funds of the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore in the same manner as taxes by the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore on all other property are paid; and
[(ii)] 2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, that portion of the taxes representing the levy on the tax increment
that would normally be paid to the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall be paid into
a special fund to be applied in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this
section. This yield shall not be considered as municipal taxes for the purposes of any
constant yield tax limitation or State or local restriction. No State real property taxes may
be paid into the special fund.
(2) BEFORE ISSUING BONDS FOR A STATE–SUPPORTED
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT APPROVED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND,
THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE SHALL, BY RESOLUTION, PLEDGE
THAT UNTIL THE BONDS ARE FULLY PAID, OR A LONGER PERIOD, THE REAL
PROPERTY TAXES IN THE STATE–SUPPORTED DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT SHALL BE
DIVIDED AS FOLLOWS:

HOUSE BILL 506
(I) THE PORTION OF THE TAXES THAT WOULD BE PRODUCED BY
THE RATE AT WHICH TAXES LEVIED EACH YEAR BY THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL
OF BALTIMORE UPON THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO AND
WHEN COLLECTED PAID INTO THE FUNDS OF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF
BALTIMORE IN THE SAME MANNER AS TAXES BY THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF
BALTIMORE ON ALL OTHER PROPERTY ARE PAID; AND
(II) THAT PORTION OF TAXES REPRESENTING THE LEVY ON THE
TAX INCREMENT THAT WOULD NORMALLY BE PAID TO THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE SHALL BE PAID TO THE TRUSTEE OF THE PROJECT TRUST
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.